Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-910
Petition; filing; contents.

Whenever a majority of the resident taxpayers of any such district, territory, neighborhood, or community intends or desires to form, organize, and establish a cemetery district which will be empowered to equip and maintain a cemetery or cemeteries when the organization thereof is completed, they shall signify such intention or desire by presenting to the county board of the county in which the greater portion of the land proposed to be included in such district is situated a petition setting forth the desires and intentions of such petitioners. Such petition may be in the form of two or more separate petitions which read substantially the same except for the different signatures and addresses thereon. Such petition shall contain the full names and post office addresses of such petitioners, the area in square miles, and the complete description of the boundaries of the real properties to be embraced in the proposed cemetery district. When such proposed district includes any municipality, the petitions must be signed by a majority of the resident taxpayers within such municipality and by a majority of the resident taxpayers outside such municipality and within the boundaries of the proposed district.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 2, p. 138.